Connecticut, session 2026, HB05276.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subsection (d) of section 31-367 of the general statutes is
2 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
3 1, 2026):
4 (d) "Employer" means the state and any political subdivision thereof
5 and, except as provided in section 31-369, as amended by this act, any
6 volunteer fire department and any volunteer ambulance company;
7 Sec. 2. Subsection (a) of section 31-369 of the general statutes is
8 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
9 1, 2026):
10 (a) This chapter applies to all employers, employees and places of
11 employment in the state except the following: (1) Employees of the
HB5276 / File No. 92 1

HB5276 File No. 92
12 United States government; [and] (2) working conditions of employees
13 over which federal agencies other than the United States Department of
14 Labor exercise statutory authority to prescribe or enforce standards or
15 regulations affecting occupational safety and health; and (3) any
16 volunteer fire department or volunteer ambulance company that is
17 regulated by the Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970, 29 USC
18 651, et seq., as amended from time to time.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 31-367(d)
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 31-369(a)
LAB Joint Favorable
HB5276 / File No. 92 2

HB5276 File No. 92
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill places volunteer fire departments and volunteer ambulance
companies under the jurisdiction of the state's Occupational Safety and
Health Act (Conn-OSHA), unless they are regulated by federal OSHA
law. This does not result in any fiscal impact as the Department of Labor
has historically considered such entities within its jurisdiction.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
HB5276 / File No. 92 3

HB5276 File No. 92
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5276
AN ACT CONCERNING VOLUNTEER FIRE DEPARTMENTS AND
THE DEFINITION OF EMPLOYER UNDER THE STATE
OCCUPATIONAL HEALTH AND SAFETY ACT.